Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Model Procurement Code

45A.005.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Kentucky Model Procurement Code.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 1979.

2016-2018 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Pt. I, A, 19, (3) at 1046.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 18, (7) at 1643.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, G, 8, (13) at 1679.

45A.010.
Construction — Purposes and policies.

This code shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this code shall be:

To simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing purchasing by the Commonwealth;

To permit the continued development of purchasing policies and practices;

To make as consistent as possible the purchasing laws among the various states;

To provide for increased public confidence in the procedures followed in public procurement;

To insure the fair and equitable treatment of all persons who deal with the procurement system of the Commonwealth;

To provide increased economy in state procurement activities by fostering effective competition; and

To provide safeguards for the maintenance of a procurement system of quality and integrity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 2, effective January 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 250, § 2, effective April 9, 1980.

45A.015.
General provisions of law applicable — Obligation of good faith.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this code, the principles of law and equity, including the Uniform Commercial Code, the law merchant, and law relative to capacity to contract, agency, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, and bankruptcy, shall supplement its provisions.

Every contract or duty under this code shall impose an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement. “Good faith” shall mean honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction concerned and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 3, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.020.
Application of code — Construction.

This code shall apply to every expenditure of public funds by this Commonwealth and every payment by contingency fee under any contract or like business agreement, excepting only that this code shall not apply to contracts or like business agreements between the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions or other governments, except as provided in KRS

45A.295

to

45A.320

. It shall also apply to the disposal of state property.

Since this code is a general act intended to provide model coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction of the subsequent legislation can be reasonably avoided.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, §§ 4, 5, effective January 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 250, § 3, effective April 9, 1980; 2018 ch. 87, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

45A.022.
Application of chapter to insurance contracts.

This chapter shall apply to all insurance contracts purchased by the Commonwealth, except where the commissioner of insurance determines, with the concurrence of the secretary of Finance and Administration Cabinet, that:

An emergency exists;

Competition is not feasible; or

The annual premium is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the health insurance contract or contracts for state employees as authorized by KRS

18A.225

shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

45A.080

,

45A.085

and

45A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 406, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 23, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 5, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 82, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 164, § 4, effective June 21, 2001; 2010, ch. 24, § 38, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/19/2004). 2004 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 2, provides, “Notwithstanding
KRS

18A.225

,

45A.022

,

45A.080

,

45A.085

,

45A.090

,

45A.225

to

45A.290

, or any other provision of KRS Chapter 45A to the contrary, retroactive to August 12, 2004, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall implement the provisions of this Act by amending the previously negotiated contracts for public employee health insurance. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide an actuarial certification that the self-insured contract amounts are actuarially sound. Any contracts entered into or modified pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the Legislative Research Commission.”

45A.023.
Multiyear federal grant project agreements — Legislative discontinuation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department for Local Government, the Department of Military Affairs, and the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security may enter into multiyear contracts, memoranda of agreement, memoranda of understanding, grant agreements, or any other similar documents that exceed the biennium in which they are made for projects that are funded solely through federal grant money.

All documents entered into in accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain a provision stating that the contract funding may be discontinued by the General Assembly in a subsequent budget.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 285, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 199, § 3, effective April 21, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 28, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 34, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). A reference to the “Office of Security Coordination” in subsection (1) of this section, as amended in 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 199, sec. 3, has been changed in codification to read the “Kentucky Office of Homeland Security” to reflect the reorganization of certain parts of the Executive Branch, as set forth in Executive Order 2005-563 and confirmed by the General Assembly in 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 193. This change was made by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 193, sec. 14.

45A.025.
Determination.

Every determination required by this code shall be in writing and based upon written findings of the public official making the determination. These determinations and written findings shall be retained in an official contract file in the office of the chief purchasing officer or in the office of the using agency administering the contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 6, effective January 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 250, § 4, effective April 9, 1980.

45A.030.
Definitions for code.

As used in this code, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Business” means any corporation, partnership, individual, sole proprietorship, joint stock company, joint venture, or any other legal entity through which business is conducted;

“Change order” means a written order signed by the purchasing officer, directing the contractor to make changes that the changes clause of the contract authorizes the purchasing officer to order without the consent of the contractor;

“Chief purchasing officer” means the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, who shall be responsible for all procurement of the Commonwealth except as provided by KRS Chapters 150, 175, 175B, 176, 177, and 180;

“Construction” means the process of building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing any public structures or buildings, or other public improvements of any kind to any public real property. It does not include the routine maintenance of existing structures, buildings, or real property;

“Construction manager-agency” means services to assist the purchasing agency manage construction that are procured through a contract that is qualifications-based;

“Construction management-at-risk” means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer enters into a single contract with an offeror that assumes the risk for construction at a contracted guaranteed maximum price as a general contractor, and provides consultation and collaboration regarding the construction during and after design of a capital project. The contract shall be subject to the bonding requirements of KRS

45A.190

;

“Construction manager-general contractor” means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer enters into a single contract with an offeror to provide preconstruction and construction services. During the preconstruction phase, the successful offeror provides design consulting services. During the construction phase, the successful offeror acts as general contractor by:

Contracting with subcontractors; and

Providing for management and construction at a fixed price with a completion deadline;

“Contract” means all types of state agreements, including grants and orders, for the acquisition, purchase, or disposal of supplies, services, construction, or any other item. It includes: awards; contracts of a fixed-price, cost, cost-plus-a-fixed-fee, contingency fee, or incentive type; contracts providing for the issuance of job or task orders; leases; letter contracts; purchase orders; public-private partnership agreements; and insurance contracts except as provided in KRS

45A.022

. It includes supplemental agreements with respect to any of the foregoing;

“Contract modification” means any written alteration in the specifications, delivery point, rate of delivery, contract period, price, quantity, or other contract provisions of any existing contract, whether accomplished by unilateral action in accordance with a contract provision or by mutual action of the parties to the contract. It includes bilateral actions, such as supplemental agreements, and unilateral actions, such as change orders, administrative changes, notices of termination, and notices of the exercise of a contract option;

“Contractor” means any person having a contract with a governmental body;

“Data” means recorded information, regardless of form or characteristic;

“Design-bid-build” means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer sequentially awards separate contracts, the first for architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services to design the project and the second for construction of the capital project according to the design. The contract shall be subject to the bonding requirements of KRS

45A.185

;

“Design-build” means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer enters into a single contract for design and construction of a capital project. The contract shall be subject to the bonding requirements of KRS

45A.190

;

“Designee” means a duly authorized representative of a person holding a superior position;

“Document” means any physical embodiment of information or ideas, regardless of form or characteristic, including electronic versions thereof;

“Employee” means an individual drawing a salary from a governmental body, whether elected or not, and any nonsalaried individual performing personal services for any governmental body;

“Governmental body” means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution, legislative body, agency, government corporation, or other establishment of the executive or legislative branch of the state government;

“Meeting” means all gatherings of every kind, including video teleconferences;

“Negotiation” means contracting by either the method set forth in KRS

45A.085

,

45A.090

, or

45A.095

;

“Person” means any business, individual, organization, or group of individuals;

“Private partner” means any entity that is a partner in a public-private partnership other than:

The Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any agency or department thereof;

The federal government;

Any other state government; or

Any agency of a state, federal, or local government;

“Procurement” means the purchasing, buying, renting, leasing, or otherwise obtaining of any supplies, services, or construction. It includes all functions that pertain to the procurement of any supply, service, or construction item, including description of requirements, selection and solicitation of sources, preparation and award of contract, and all phases of contract administration;

“Public-private partnership” means a project delivery method for construction or financing of capital projects, as defined in KRS

45.750

, or procurement of services, pursuant to a written public-private partnership agreement entered into pursuant to KRS

45A.077

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, between:

At least one (1) private partner; and

The Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any agency or department thereof;

“Purchase request” or “purchase requisition” means that document whereby a using agency requests that a contract be obtained for a specified need, and may include, but is not limited to, the technical description of the requested item, delivery schedule, transportation, criteria for evaluation of solicitees, suggested sources of supply, and information supplied for the making of any written determination and finding required by KRS

45A.025

;

“Purchasing agency” means any governmental body that is authorized by this code or its implementing administrative regulations or by way of delegation from the chief purchasing officer to contract on its own behalf rather than through the central contracting authority of the chief purchasing officer;

“Purchasing officer” means any person authorized by a governmental body in accordance with procedures prescribed by administrative regulations to enter into and administer contracts and make written determinations and findings with respect thereto. The term includes an authorized representative acting within the limits of authority;

“Services” means the rendering by a contractor of its time and effort rather than the furnishing of a specific end product, other than reports that are merely incidental to the required performance of services;

“Supplemental agreement” means any contract modification that is accomplished by the mutual action of the parties;

“Supplies” means all property, including but not limited to leases of real property, printing, and insurance, except land or a permanent interest in land;

“Using agency” means any governmental body of the state that utilizes any supplies, services, or construction purchased under this code;

“Video teleconference” means one (1) meeting, occurring in two (2) or more locations, where individuals can see and hear each other by means of video and audio equipment; and

“Writing” or “written” means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 7, effective January 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 250, § 5, effective April 9, 1980; 1982, ch. 406, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 120, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 486, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 98, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2015 ch. 105, § 9, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 67, § 1, effective April 8, 2016; 2018 ch. 87, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 197, § 2, effective April 13, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 67, sec. 16 provided that the amendments made to this statute and KRS

45A.075

and the creation of KRS

45A.077

in that Act shall apply only to a project for which the procurement process is initiated on or after the effective date of that Act, which was April 8, 2016, either through the initial invitation for bids, request for proposals, or otherwise.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 120 and 486. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 486, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

45A.035.
Secretary to adopt regulations.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have power and authority over, and may, except as otherwise expressly provided in this code, adopt regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A and consistent with this code governing the purchasing, management, and control of any and all supplies, services, and construction, and other items required to be purchased by the Commonwealth. The secretary shall consider and decide matters of policy with regard to state procurement. The secretary shall have the power of review with respect to the implementation of regulations and policy determinations.

Regulations shall be adopted governing the following:

Conditions and procedures for delegations of purchasing authority;

Prequalification, suspension, debarment, and reinstatement of prospective bidders;

Small purchase procedures;

Conditions and procedures for the purchase of items for resale;

Conditions and procedures for the purchase of agricultural products in accordance with KRS

45A.645

;

Conditions and procedures for the use of source selection methods authorized by this code, including emergency purchases;

Opening and rejection of bids or offers, consideration of alternate bids, and waiver of informalities in offers;

Confidentiality of technical data and trade secrets information submitted by actual or prospective bidders or offerors;

Partial, progressive, and multiple awards;

Supervision of storerooms and inventories, including determination of appropriate stock levels and the management, transfer, sale, or other disposal of state-owned property;

Definitions and classes of contractual services and procedures for acquiring them;

An appeals process to resolve disputes arising from specifications requiring items deemed to be equivalent or a sole brand as specified in KRS

45A.170

; and

Use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS

45A.070

.

The secretary may adopt such other regulations as deemed advisable to carry out the purposes of this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 8, effective January 1, 1979; 2002, ch. 344, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 47, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 63, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

45A.040.
Procurement activities — Distribution.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide for the distribution of the cabinet’s procurement activities and functions among the various bureaus within the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 9, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.045.
Authority of cabinet — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall serve as the central procurement and contracting agency of the Commonwealth.

The cabinet shall require all agencies to furnish an estimate of specific needs for supplies, materials, and equipment to be purchased by competitive bidding for the purpose of permitting scheduling of purchasing in large volume. The cabinet shall establish and enforce schedules for purchasing supplies, materials, and equipment. In addition, prior to the beginning of each fiscal year all agencies shall submit to the Finance and Administration Cabinet an estimate of all needs for supplies, materials, and equipment during that year which will have to be required through competitive bidding.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have power, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, to transfer between departments, to salvage, to exchange, and to condemn supplies, equipment, and real property.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall attempt in every practicable way to ensure that state agencies are fulfilling their business needs through the application of the best value criteria.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall recommend regulations, rules, and procedures and shall have supervision over all purchases by the various spending agencies, except as otherwise provided by law, and, subject to the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, shall promulgate administrative regulations to govern purchasing by or for all these agencies. The cabinet shall publish a manual of procedures which shall be incorporated by reference as an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. This manual shall be distributed to agencies and shall be revised upon issuance of amendments to these procedures. No purchase or contract shall be binding on the state or any agency thereof unless approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or made under general administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase or otherwise acquire, or, with the approval of the secretary, may delegate and control the purchase and acquisition of the combined requirements of all spending agencies of the state, including, but not limited to, interests in real property, contractual services, rentals of all types, supplies, materials, equipment, and services.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of any interest in real property of the state which is not needed, or has become unsuitable for public use, or would be more suitable to the public’s interest if used in another manner, as determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The determination of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be set forth in an order and shall be reached only after review of a written request by the agency desiring to dispose of the property. This request shall describe the property and state the reasons why the agency believes the property should be disposed. All instruments required by law to be recorded which convey any interest in any real property so disposed of shall be executed and signed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and approved by the Governor. Unless the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet deems it in the best interest of the state to proceed otherwise, all interests in real property shall be sold either by invitation of sealed bids or by public auction. The selling price of any interest in real property shall not be less than the appraised value thereof as determined by the cabinet, or the Transportation Cabinet for the requirements of that cabinet.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of all personal property of the state that is not needed, or has become unsuitable for public use, or would be more suitable to the public’s interest if used in another manner, or, with the approval of the secretary, may delegate the sale, trade, or other disposal of the personal property. In the event the authority is delegated, the method for disposal shall be determined by the agency head, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and shall be set forth in a document describing the property and stating the method of disposal and the reasons why the agency believes the property should be disposed of. In the event the authority is not delegated, requests to the Finance and Administration Cabinet to sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of the property shall describe the property and state the reasons why the agency believes the property should be disposed of. The method for disposal shall be determined by the Division of Surplus Properties, and approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall exercise general supervision and control over all warehouses, storerooms, and stores and of all inventories of supplies, services, and construction belonging to the Commonwealth. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to require agencies to take and maintain inventories of plant property, buildings, structures, other fixed assets, and equipment. The cabinet shall conduct periodic physical audits of inventories.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall establish and maintain programs for the development and use of purchasing specifications and for the inspection, testing, and acceptance of supplies, services, and construction.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the Finance and Administration Cabinet from negotiating with vendors who maintain a General Services Administration price agreement with the United States of America or any agency thereof. No contract executed under this provision shall authorize a price higher than is contained in the contract between the General Services Administration and the vendor affected.

Except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180, and subject to the provisions of this code, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to be needed for state use, upon approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as to the determination of need and as to the action of purchase or other acquisition. The amount paid for this real property shall not exceed the appraised value as determined by the cabinet or the Transportation Cabinet (for such requirements of that cabinet), or the value set by eminent domain procedure. Subject to the provisions of this code, real property or any interest therein may be purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired from any officer or employee of any agency of the state upon a finding by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, based upon a written application by the head of the agency requesting the purchase, and approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Governor, that the employee has not either himself or herself, or through any other person, influenced or attempted to influence either the agency requesting the acquisition of the property or the Finance and Administration Cabinet in connection with such acquisition. Whenever such an acquisition is consummated, the request and finding shall be recorded and kept by the Secretary of State along with the other documents recorded pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 56.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain records of all purchases and sales made under its authority and shall make periodic summary reports of all transactions to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Governor, and the General Assembly. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall also report trends in costs and prices, including savings realized through improved practices, to the above authorities. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall also compile an annual report of state purchases by all spending agencies in the state’s statewide accounting and reporting system. The report format shall include, but not be limited to, dollar amount, volume, type of purchase, and vendor.

For capital construction projects, subject to the provisions of this code and KRS

45A.180

, the procurement may be on whichever of the following alternative project delivery methods, in the judgment of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet after first considering the traditional design-bid-build project delivery method, offers the best value to the taxpayer:

A design-build basis; or

A construction management-at-risk basis.

Proposals shall be reviewed by the engineering staff to assure quality and value, and compliance with procurement procedures. All specifications shall be written to promote competition. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the procurement of phased bidding or construction manager-agency services.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have control and supervision over all purchases of energy-consuming equipment, supplies, and related equipment purchased or acquired by any agency of the state as provided in this code, and shall promulgate administrative regulations to designate the manner in which an energy-consuming item will be purchased so as to promote energy conservation and acquisition of energy efficient products. Major energy components shall be amortized on a seven (7) to ten (10) years’ recovery basis and shall take into consideration the projected cost of fuel. The Finance and Administration Cabinet, in consultation with the Cabinet for Economic Development, shall conduct a thorough economic feasibility analysis on any major energy-using component of at least three million (3,000,000) BTU’s per hour heat input and shall issue a certificate of economic feasibility prior to the Finance and Administration Cabinet’s purchasing or retrofitting any such component that utilizes any fuel other than coal. The economic feasibility analysis shall consist of life-cycle cost comparisons of a component that would utilize coal and one(s) that would utilize any fuel other than coal. For the analysis, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide detailed estimates of equipment purchase price, installation cost, annual operation and maintenance costs, and usage patterns of energy-using components.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 10, effective January 1, 1979; 1990, ch. 496, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 277, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 24, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 5, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 98, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 69, effective June 20, 2005.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, D, 7, (5) at 1664.

45A.047.
Disposition of firearms or ammunition owned by state agency — Disposition of proceeds upon sale — Restriction on purchase of body armor for service animal.

When an agency of Kentucky state government or a public university safety and security department organized pursuant to KRS

164.950

disposes of firearms or ammunition owned by that agency, the disposition shall be by:

Public auction to persons who are eligible under federal law to purchase the type of firearm or ammunition;

Trade to the federally licensed firearms dealer providing new firearms or ammunition to the agency;

Transfer to another government agency or government-operated museum in Kentucky for official use or display; or

Sale to a current or retiring employee as authorized by law.

If the firearms or ammunition are sold, the proceeds of the sale shall be utilized solely for the purchase of body armor for officers meeting or exceeding National Institute of Justice standards, firearms, ammunition, or range facilities, or a combination thereof, by the agency of government. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

Body armor purchased for a service animal shall be purchased only for an animal owned by the law enforcement agency specified in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 129, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 281, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2015 ch. 20, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

45A.050.
Centralization of procurement — Exemptions.

Except as provided in KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

and KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180, all rights, powers, duties, and authority relating to the procurement of supplies, services, and construction, and the management, control, warehousing, sale, and disposal of supplies, services, and construction now vested in or exercised by any state agency under the several statutes relating thereto, are hereby transferred to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as provided in this code, subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

Unless otherwise ordered by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the acquisition of the following shall not be required through the Finance and Administration Cabinet:

Works of art for museum and public display;

Published books, maps, periodicals, and technical pamphlets; and

Services of visiting speakers, professors, and performing artists.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall include in all state agency price contracts for the purchase of materials or supplies a provision that, as approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, any political subdivision, including cities of all classes, counties, school districts, or special districts, may participate in these contracts to the same extent as the Commonwealth. Any political subdivision may purchase materials and supplies in accordance with a contract for supplies and materials entered into by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the Commonwealth, including those contracts negotiated by the cabinet with vendors who maintain a General Services Administration price agreement as provided in KRS 45A.045(8). Political subdivisions of the Commonwealth must comply with other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes which require purchase by competitive bidding, before participating in the contract, unless the state contract has been let by competitive bidding, or the contract was negotiated as provided in KRS 45A.045(8).

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall inform the Department for Local Government, which shall then inform the appropriate purchasing agent of each political subdivision interested in participating under this section, of all state agency contracts in effect between the Commonwealth and vendors.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary for the implementation of this section and necessary to provide that the Commonwealth be reimbursed for any additional expenses incurred by the Commonwealth in allowing political subdivisions to participate in contracts with vendors.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall comply with all provisions relating to the methods of purchasing in the Kentucky Revised Statutes. This section is not intended to repeal or otherwise affect any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes regarding purchasing methods of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, all public agencies as defined in KRS

45A.490

shall comply with the provisions for reciprocal preference for resident bidders in KRS

45A.490

to

45A.494

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 11, effective January 1, 1979; 1990, ch. 496, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 95, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 25, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 69, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 29, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 35, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 162, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 117 and 162, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since there is nothing in the subsection (4) of KRS

45A.030

definition of “construction” which relates to road building, and subsection (1) of this section excises road building from the operation of KRS Chapter 45A, KRS Chapter 45A does not apply to the Department of Transportation (now Transportation Cabinet).

OAG 81-349

.

45A.055.
State purchasing regulations.

Prior to January 1, 1979, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall publish the initial state purchasing regulations in accordance with current Finance and Administration Cabinet policies and procedures. The initial regulations may be promulgated on an interim basis, without regard to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, provided, however, that final regulations shall be promulgated pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A within two hundred forty (240) days following the promulgation of the initial regulations.

All additions, deletions, or other modifications of the final purchasing regulations issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be promulgated by the secretary in accordance with any applicable provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

The secretary shall not delegate his power to issue the state purchasing regulations under subsections (1) and (2) of this section to any other person or agency, and no state purchasing regulations shall be issued except as approved by the secretary.

No state purchasing regulation shall change in any way a contract commitment by the Commonwealth nor of a contractor to the Commonwealth, which was in existence on the effective date of the regulation.

The provisions of state purchasing regulations promulgated as authorized herein shall be considered to be incorporated by operation of law in all state contracts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 12, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.060.
Relationship with using agencies.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain a close and cooperative relationship with the using agencies of the Commonwealth. Any using agency may at any time make recommendations concerning procurement to the secretary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 13, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.065.
Advisory councils — Procurement institute.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may appoint advisory councils to assist him with respect to specifications and procurement in specific commodity areas as well as other matters within his authority. Advisory council members may consist of such qualified representatives of government, industry, educational institutions, and the general public as the secretary may deem desirable. Members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of council duties subject to the provisions of KRS

45.101

.

The secretary may also establish and maintain, either alone or in cooperation with other states, the federal government, municipalities, or other units of local government, a procurement institute for the purpose of disseminating information concerning state procurement and for training and educating officials and other persons in procurement, including persons not employed by the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 14, effective January 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 450, § 61, effective July 1, 1983; 2009, ch. 12, § 27, effective June 25, 2009.